Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 17 LOCAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT CODE — GUARANTEE FUND
§ 50-1763. Bonds, warrants and coupons, when paid out of fund — Nonpayment for want of funds — Interest.

Whenever any municipality has established such “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund,” any bond, warrant or coupon drawn against any local improvement fund is presented to the municipality for payment and there is not sufficient amount in said local improvement fund against which to draw to pay the same, unless otherwise requested by the holder, payment therefor shall be made by warrant drawn against the “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund.” Such warrants when presented to the city treasurer for payment, if not paid, shall be registered and draw interest at a rate as may be fixed by the council. Neither the holder nor the owner of any bond or warrant issued under the provisions of this act shall have any claim therefor, except for payment from the special assessments made for the improvement for which said bond or warrant was issued, and except as against the “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund” herein provided, and the municipality shall not be liable to any holder or owner of such bond or warrant for any loss to the guarantee fund occurring in the lawful operation thereof by the municipality.

§ 50-1764. Subrogation of municipality to rights of payee — Surplus funds — Payment into fund — Preferences.

Whenever there shall be paid out of the “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund,” any sum on account of principal or interest of a local improvement fund or warrant, the municipality as trustee for the fund, shall be subrogated to all the rights of the holder of the bond or interest coupon or warrant so paid, and the policies thereof, or the assessment underlying the same, shall become part of the guarantee fund. There shall be paid into the guarantee fund any surplus remaining in any local improvement fund after the payment of all outstanding bonds or warrants, payable out of such local improvement fund. Bonds or warrants guaranteed by such fund shall have no preference except in the order of presentation for payment.

§ 50-1765. Maintenance and operation and sources of fund.

The council shall prescribe rules and regulations for the maintenance and operation of the guarantee fund not inconsistent herewith. After the creation of such fund, all money derived from the assignment of delinquency certificates, redemptions, sale of property under foreclosure for delinquent assessments, or from the rent or sale of property, title to which has been obtained by the municipality pursuant to this code, shall be paid into the “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund,” and all delinquency certificates issued and such property acquired shall be held by the municipality for the benefit of such guarantee fund. Money from the guarantee fund may be used to redeem property subject to local improvement assessments from general tax delinquencies, underlying bonds or warrants guaranteed by the fund, or to purchase such property as [at] county tax sales or otherwise, from the county for the purpose of protecting the guarantee fund. After so acquiring title to real property, the municipality may lease or sell and convey the same for such price and on such terms as may be determined by the council, and any provision of law, charter or ordinance to the contrary notwithstanding, and all proceeds resulting therefrom shall belong to and be paid into the guarantee fund, provided, however, that in any event the municipality purchases such property at tax sale or otherwise it shall not be sold for a lesser sum than the city paid therefor.

§ 50-1766. Replenishment of fund — Warrants — Issuance against fund — Tax levy.

Whenever there is not a sufficient amount of cash in said “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund,” at any time to pay any and all warrants, together with interest thereon, drawn against said fund, the council may replenish said “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund” by transferring or appropriating to it, moneys from the general fund of the municipality or other available sources, as may be determined by said council, subject, however, to the limitations herein prescribed. Warrants drawing interest, as herein provided, may be issued against said “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund” to meet any financial liability against it; but at the time of making its next annual levy the municipality shall provide for the levy of a sum sufficient with other resources of the guarantee fund to pay warrants so issued and outstanding, the tax for this purpose not to exceed two hundredths percent (.02%) of the market value for assessment purposes on taxable property within the municipal corporation in any one (1) year.

§ 50-1767. Bonds and warrants — Revenues from which payable.

The holder or owner of any local improvement bond or warrant shall have no claim thereon against the municipality by which the same is issued, except to the extent of the funds created and received by assessments against the property within any local improvement district and to the extent of his pro rata share of any “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund,” authorized and created under the provisions of this code.

§ 50-1768. Bonds payable from fund.

Whenever a municipality has created a “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund,” under the provisions of [this title,] any local improvement district bonds issued thereafter shall provide that the principal sum of such funds [bonds] and the interest thereon shall be payable out of the local improvement fund created for the payment of cost and expenses of the improvement or out of any “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund,” duly authorized and created, and not otherwise.

§ 50-1769. Excess in fund — Disposition.

When a “Local Improvement Guarantee Fund” duly created in any municipality exceeds in amount of moneys held therein ten per cent (10%) of the total outstanding obligations thereby guaranteed, then the council, may, by ordinance, authorize the treasurer or appropriate official of said municipality to return and pay such said excess or any part thereof to the general fund of said municipality to return and pay such said excess or any designated part thereof all or any part of local improvement district bonds of said municipality then issued and outstanding or to be issued. The passage of such ordinance shall require the affirmative vote of at least three-fourths (3/4) of the full council.

§ 50-1770. Unpatented lands — Assessment for improvements.

Whenever any of the public lands are embraced within the boundaries of any city of this state, and the city authorities deem it necessary that a sewer system, street improvements or other public improvements of any kind, authorized by general law, be made therein for the preservation of the health, accommodation or convenience of such inhabitants, the city council may, by ordinance, provide for the assessment of a portion of the expense of such improvement against unpatented lots, blocks or parcels of land, and the improvements thereon, embraced within the limits of such city, to the same extent and amount as though such lands were patented. When patents issue for such lands the lien of the assessment against each lot, piece and parcel of land shall attach immediately and be enforced and collected as other taxes, or as provided, by ordinance, of such city; provided, this section shall not apply nor authorize the creation of any lien upon state lands.

§ 50-1771. Reserve fund authorized.

For the purpose of securing the payment of the principal of and interest on an issue of local improvement bonds, notes, warrants, or other short-term obligations, the council or other governing body of a governmental entity may create a reserve fund for each obligation in addition to or in lieu of a guarantee fund. The reserve fund shall be separate and apart from any guarantee fund and in an amount not exceeding ten per cent (10%) of the principal amount of the bonds, notes, or warrants issued. The cost of a reserve fund may be included in the cost and expense of any local improvement for assessment against the property in the local improvement district to pay the cost, or any part thereof. The reserve fund may be funded from the proceeds of the bonds, notes, warrants, or other short-term obligations, from special assessment payments, or from any other money legally available therefor. Reserve fund balances in excess of ten per cent (10%) of the principal amount of the bonds outstanding shall be used to reduce the annual assessments of those participants in the respective local improvement district whose prior assessments have been paid. Whenever the reserve fund is insufficient to meet claims for payment of principal and interest against the reserve fund, the governmental entity may appropriate funds from such other legally available sources as may be determined by the council or governing body of such governmental entity.

§ 50-1772. Commercially reasonable credit assurances.

If requested by the petitioners for a local improvement district, and in addition to or in lieu of a reserve or guarantee requirement, the council or other governing body of a governmental entity may impose such commercially reasonable credit assurances as it may deem necessary as a condition of approving a local improvement district. If commercially reasonable, such assurances may include guarantees, letters of credit or bonds in amounts up to the total amount of indebtedness.